Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 31. Drainage Districts with County Commissioners
§ 51-31-111.
Additional bond issue.

The drainage commissioners of any county in which a drainage district has been organized and who have sold bonds for 80% of the assessment on the lands in such district, and who have provided for the collection of the remaining twenty per cent of the assessment on the lands in such district in cash within not less than four months, are authorized to issue and sell the bonds, notes, or other objects of indebtedness of the drainage district for the twenty per cent, or any part thereof, which was provided to have been paid in cash and which has not yet been paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4330; 1930, § 4427; 1942, § 4632; Laws, 1912, ch. 202.

§ 51-31-113.
Interest rate of additional bonds.

The bonds, notes, or other objects of indebtedness issued under the provisions of Section 51-31-111 shall bear interest not exceeding 6% per annum and shall be non-taxable.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4331; 1930, § 4428; 1942, § 4633; Laws, 1912, ch. 202.

§ 51-31-115.
Notice of issue to be published.

Before the sale of any such bonds, notes, or other objects of indebtedness provided for in Sections 51-31-111 and 51-31-113, the drainage commissioners shall publish notice to all parties interested for at least ten days of their intention to issue said additional bonds. Any time after the expiration of the ten days from the action of the chancellor in approving the action of the commissioners in the issuance of such bonds, notes, or evidence of indebtedness, and after ten days from the entry of the order of the chancellor, made in term time or vacation, approving the action of the commissioners in issuing such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued and sold by the commissioners shall be a lien on the lands assessed in the drainage district and shall be non-contestable.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4332; 1930, § 4429; 1942, § 4634; Laws, 1912, ch. 202.

§ 51-31-117.
Proceedings in rem.

All proceedings under this chapter are declared to be proceedings in rem. The notices for the organization of a drainage district hereunder and all subsequent notices herein provided for shall be sufficient as notices for the purposes stated, the organization of a district, and the issuance of district bonds as herein provided. The failure of the clerk to send a copy of any notice by registered mail to any nonresident, whose residence is known or unknown, shall not invalidate the proceedings for the organization of any drainage district hereunder or of bonds of the district issued under same; but the court or chancellor in vacation may adjourn the hearing of any case in order to cause other notice to be made, if in his discretion he thinks proper, in order to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4329; 1930, § 4430; 1942, § 4635; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-119.
Subdrainage districts authorized.

When one third of the landowners owning a majority of the acreage or a majority of the landowners owning a third of the acreage of real property within a proposed subdrainage district, composed of lands wholly within a drainage district or partly within and partly without such drainage district, shall petition the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, and shall file a good bond to pay for the expense of the survey of the proposed subdrainage district in case the district is not formed, the said court or the chancellor in vacation shall enter an order directing the drainage commissioners of the county to cause a survey to be made and to ascertain the limits of the region which would be benefited by a proposed system of improvements, giving a general idea of its character, and the estimated costs of drainage, and making such suggestions as to the size of the drainage ditches and their location as the drainage commissioners may deem advisable. They shall file their report with the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which the greater portion of the territory proposed to be included in said subdrainage district is situate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4431; 1942, § 4636; Laws, 1922, ch. 214.

§ 51-31-121.
Notice of subdistrict proceedings.

Upon the filing of said report with the clerk, he shall make an entry to that effect upon the minutes of said court and shall set down and fix the term of court next thereafter convening, or shall set down and fix a day in vacation, as he may deem best, when the court or the chancellor in vacation shall hear said matter. The clerk shall thereupon give notice by publication for two weeks, by two insertions in some newspaper published in the county in which the greater part of the land lies, notifying all persons interested to appear at the term of court or day set in vacation and show cause, if any, why said subdistrict should not be organized or bonds be issued to pay for said work.

However, the day set for hearing shall not be more than sixty days after the first of said notices is published. The said notice by publication shall be full and complete notice to any and all persons interested, and shall confer full and complete power and authority upon the court or chancellor in vacation to act in said matter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4432; 1942, § 4637; Laws, 1922, ch. 214.

§ 51-31-123.
Creation of subdistrict.

At the time so appointed by the clerk, the court or chancellor in vacation shall hear the said matter and the objections, if any, of any person or firm interested. If the court or chancellor in vacation shall find that said subdrainage district will conduce to the public benefit and that the same should be organized, the court or chancellor in vacation will enter an order to that effect. Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to prohibit the formation and organization of a drainage district wholly or partly within a drainage district already organized. A district independent of the district already organized may be organized where a part or all of the lands are in the district already organized, provided that the petition of the landowners is presented as heretofore specified and asks that said court or chancellor in vacation constitute them a drainage district under the terms of Sections 51-31-119 through 51-31-127, and that the notice set out in Section 51-31-121 has been given. Thereafter proceedings shall be had substantially in conformity with this chapter for the creation of an original drainage district hereunder. When such a subdrainage district is organized as herein provided, it shall have all the rights, privileges and powers of any other district and shall have full power to make and levy assessments, issue bonds independent of any other district, and do all other things now provided by law for the formation and organization of a drainage district under this chapter. When any such district is organized, the several parcels of land thereof that are included within the corporate limits of the original drainage district shall still be liable to the district already organized for all assessments of benefits theretofore made or to an assessment of benefits thereafter levied, if any, or received by them; and in like manner shall receive credit for any work done which is a benefit to the district already organized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4433; 1942, § 4638; Laws, 1922, ch. 214.

§ 51-31-125.
Subdistricts managed by drainage commissioners.

When a subdrainage district has been established as hereinbefore provided, the county drainage commissioners shall be the commissioners of said subdrainage district; and proceedings to organize subdrainage districts and to do improvements therein shall conform substantially to the provision of this chapter with reference to the organization, doing the improvements, and operating other drainage districts authorized by this chapter. Said commissioners are empowered and authorized to issue bonds of such subdrainage districts, and such bonds shall be so designated. The same proceedings, or as near as practicable the same, shall be had in the issuance of bonds of a subdrainage district as are required in the issuance of bonds of the drainage district in the first instance, as provided in this chapter. The proceeds from the sale of bonds of a subdrainage district shall be applied and used exclusively for doing the work within or for the exclusive benefit of said subdrainage district for the construction of internal drains of said subdrainage district, and in carrying out and perfecting its internal drains.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4434; 1942, § 4639; Laws, 1922, ch. 214.

§ 51-31-127.
Separate financial account kept for subdrainage district.

The drainage commissioners and the treasurer of the main drainage district shall keep a separate account of all funds and expenses and payments of a subdrainage district, so that at any time the account will show the exact financial condition of such subdrainage district, both as to receipts and disbursements.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4435; 1942, § 4640; Laws, 1922, ch. 214.

§ 51-31-129.
Collection of taxes.

All taxes levied under the terms of any drainage law of the State of Mississippi shall be payable at the same time the state and county taxes are payable, and if any taxes so levied under this chapter are not paid at maturity, the tax collector of the county where the land is situated shall, after having advertised said lands for sale for the same length of time and in the same manner as land delinquent for state and county taxes are now required to be advertised, sell the lands so delinquent for taxes thereon, together with all costs and five per centum damages on the amount of taxes for which the land was sold. Said sale shall be separate and distinct from all other sales for taxes, but shall be held at the same place and time where sales of delinquent lands for state and county taxes are held.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4440; 1942, § 4645; Laws, 1926, ch. 301; Laws, 1934, ch. 227.

§ 51-31-131.
Delinquent lands.

When lands are offered for sale for unpaid drainage district taxes and no person will bid therefor the amount of taxes, damages, and costs due, the same shall be struck off to the drainage district wherein the land lies, and otherwise dealt with as lands which are sold to the state for delinquent state and county taxes. The drainage commissioners shall be authorized to pay the state and county taxes on lands thus acquired by it, to redeem the same from state and county tax sales, and to collect the money thus paid with the same damage and interest allowed individuals in similar cases under the general revenue laws of the state therein from the date of such payment, upon the redemption of lands from the drainage district sale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4441; 1942, § 4646; Laws, 1926, ch. 301.

§ 51-31-133.
Tax lists.

The lists of lands sold by the tax collector to individuals and to the drainage district shall be made as required to be made by the state and county collector for state and county lands, and shall be filed with the clerk of the chancery court within ten days after the tax sale. Each shall have the same force and effect, confer the same rights, and be entitled to the same remedies for redemption and otherwise as lists made for delinquent taxes by the state and county collector for state and county lands. But such title shall be subject to a title acquired under a sale for state and county taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4442; 1942, § 4647; Laws, 1926, ch. 301.

§ 51-31-135.
Record of tax sales.

A list of conveyances of lands sold to drainage districts for drainage district tax or to individuals shall be recorded in a well-bound and indexed book, which shall be kept in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which said drainage district is located. It shall be the same book in which other tax sales to individuals are recorded, and shall have the same effect as notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4443; 1942, § 4648; Laws, 1926, ch. 301.

§ 51-31-137.
Expiration of redemption period.

After two years’ time for redemption has expired, the drainage district commissioners may take possession of land sold to the district for said district, and lease or sell any lands which it has acquired at tax sale to any person in the manner that the said commissioners may think is to the best interests of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4444; 1942, § 4649; Laws, 1926, ch. 301.

§ 51-31-139.
District placed under supervisors.

On petition of one third of the landowners owning one half of the land or one half of the landowners owning one third of the land located in any drainage district, the chancery court, if it be satisfied that the petition contains the percentage of the landowners as outlined above, shall set a date and place for a hearing on the matter and order notice given of the time and the place of said hearing, the same to be set in vacation or term time according to the order of the chancellor. The notice shall be given by three weeks’ publication in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the county where the drainage district is located, and shall be directed substantially to the landowners, lienholders, bondholders, and all others interested in the drainage district referred to. Said notice shall be complete on the publication of the same in the said newspaper for three consecutive weekly issues, the first notice to be at least three weeks before the date of hearing. At the time and place fixed for the hearing or at any other time or place to which the same shall have been lawfully postponed by the chancellor, the said chancery court, if satisfied that the aforesaid conditions have been fulfilled and that all projects of said drainage district have been completed, shall transfer all the duties, power, and authority of any drainage commission or drainage commissioners of any drainage district lying wholly within one county, and impose the same upon the board of supervisors of the county in which the particular drainage district lies. The board of supervisors of the county in which any such completed drainage project lies shall have charge of maintenance, repair, and upkeep of such completed construction project and shall make report of same annually to the chancery court of the county, but no additional compensation shall be allowed the board of supervisors for the discharge of services hereby imposed. It is provided that on the making of the order of transfer, as above outlined, the compensation and authority of any drainage commissioner or set of drainage commissioners regarding any such drainage district, as above outlined, shall immediately cease on the signing of the decree of transfer above provided for.

It is distinctly provided that this section shall not apply in any manner whatsoever to drainage districts lying in two or more counties of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4657; Laws, 1932, ch. 186; Laws, 1934, ch. 228.

§ 51-31-141.
Procedure for districts to come under this chapter.

Any district which has heretofore been organized, including swamp land districts, or which may hereafter be organized under other statutes may become a district under the terms of this chapter as follows:

If a third of the landowners owning a majority of the acreage or a majority of the landowners owning a third of the acreage of real property within any such district shall petition the chancery court or chancellor in vacation to constitute them a drainage district under the terms hereof, the clerk of the chancery court shall give notice of the application by two weeks’ publication in some newspaper published and having a bona fide circulation in the county or counties in which the lands of said district lie, stating the time when said petition will be heard and the object of said petition. All owners of real property within the district shall have the right to appear and contest the said petition, or support the same. The chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, shall hear the evidence and shall either grant the petition or deny the same, as he may deem it most advantageous to the property owners of the district and to the public benefit. If he grants the petition, the said district shall have all the rights and powers and be subject to all the obligations and provisions provided by the terms of this chapter. If the majority of the landholders or the majority of the owners of the acreage therein petition for the adoption of this chapter, the court or chancellor must make an order declaring that such district shall henceforth be governed by the terms of this chapter, and shall appoint commissioners according to its terms, who shall carry into effect without delay the proposed drainage improvements.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4446; 1942, § 4672; Laws, 1956, ch. 348.

§ 51-31-143.
Drainage law construed.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to promote the ditching, drainage, and reclamation of wet, swampy, and overflowed lands. The collection of assessments shall not be defeated by reason of any omission, imperfection, or defect in the organization of any district or in any proceedings occurring prior to the decree of the court confirming assessment of benefits and damages; but said decree shall be conclusive that all prior proceedings were regular and according to law. In case any assessment shall be held to be void for want of notice, the said commissioners may, upon motion, be permitted to give such owner due notice and ask for a time to be set by the court or chancellor in vacation. The court or chancellor shall set such time for hearing any and all objections that said landowner may have to such proceedings and assessment, may make such order in reference thereto as justice may require, and shall assess to such landowner his just proportion of the benefits received by him by such proposed work. Thereupon such assessment as to such landowner shall be conclusive.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1711; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4300; 1930, § 4436; 1942, § 4641.